Hawaii statutes.
§587A-30 Periodic review hearing. (a)
The court shall set a periodic review hearing to be conducted no later than six
months after a child's date of entry into foster care. Thereafter, the court
shall conduct periodic review hearings at intervals of no longer than six
months until the court's jurisdiction is terminated unless the child is in the
permanent custody of the department or an authorized agency. If the child is
in the permanent custody of the department or an authorized agency, the court
shall conduct a permanency hearing at intervals of no longer than six months
until the court's jurisdiction is terminated. The court may set a case for a
periodic review hearing upon the motion of a party at any time, if the court
deems the hearing to be in the best interests of the child.

(b) At each periodic review hearing, the court
shall review the status of the case to determine whether the child is receiving
appropriate services and care, whether the case plan is being properly
implemented, and whether the department's or authorized agency's activities are
directed toward a permanent placement for the child. At the hearing, the court
shall:

(1) Determine whether the child is safe and enter
orders:

(A) That the child be placed in foster
custody if the court finds that the child's remaining in the family home is
contrary to the welfare of the child and the child's parents are not willing
and able to provide a safe family home for the child, even with the assistance
of a service plan;

(B) That the child be placed in family
supervision if the court finds that the child's parents are willing and able to
provide the child with a safe family home with the assistance of a service
plan; or

(C) To terminate jurisdiction if the court
finds that the child's parents are willing and able to provide the child with a
safe family home without the assistance of a service plan;

(2) Determine the continued need for and
appropriateness of the out-of-home placement;

(3) Determine the extent to which each party has complied
with the case plan and the family's progress in making their home safe for the
child;

(4) Determine the family's
progress in resolving the problems that caused the child harm or to be
threatened with harm and, if applicable, the necessity for continued
out-of-home placement of the child;

(5) Project a likely date for:

(A) The child's return to a safe family home;
or

(B) The child's permanent placement out of
the family home in the following order of preference:

(i) Adoption;

(ii) Legal guardianship; or

(iii) Other permanent out-of-home placement;

(6) Evaluate visitation arrangements; and

(7) Issue such further or other appropriate orders as
it deems to be in the best interests of the child.

(c) If the child has been in foster care under
the responsibility of the department for an aggregate of fifteen out of the
most recent twenty-two months from the date of entry into foster care, the
department shall file a motion to terminate parental rights, unless:

(1) The department has documented in the safe family
home factors or other written report submitted to the court a compelling reason
why it is not in the best interest of the child to file a motion; or

(2) The department has not provided to the family of
the child, consistent with the time period required in the service plan, such
services as the department deems necessary for the safe return of the child to
the family home.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the
department from filing a motion to terminate parental rights if the department
determines that the criteria for terminating parental rights are present. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 51, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next